Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 2. Specific Coverage Provisions.

Sec. 21.42.345.
Required provision for coverage of dependents.

A health care insurance plan providing coverage for a dependent of a covered individual shall, as to the dependent’s coverage, also provide that the health care insurance benefits applicable for dependents shall be payable with respect to

a newly born child of a covered individual from the moment of birth;

a child adopted by a covered individual from the date of adoption;

a child placed with a covered individual for adoption from the date of placement for adoption; and

a spouse from not later than the first day of the first month beginning after the date the request for enrollment is received, but the insurer may require that a request for enrollment be received within 31 days of the date of marriage.

The coverage for a newly born child under this section shall consist of coverage of injury or sickness, including the necessary care and treatment of medically diagnosed congenital defects and birth abnormalities.

If payment of a specific charge is required to provide coverage for a child under this section, the policy or contract may require that notification of birth of a newly born child, adopted child, or child placed for adoption and payment of the required premium or fees may be required to be furnished to the health care insurer within 31 days after the date of birth, adoption, or placement for adoption in order to have the coverage continue beyond the 31-day period.

Under (a) — (c) of this section, a health care insurer shall offer coverage for a family member, including a newly born child, adopted child, or child placed for adoption, regardless of the marital status of the covered individual.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 123 SLA 1992; am § 73 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 44 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 43 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.42.347.
Coverage for costs of birth.

A health care insurer who provides coverage for the costs of childbirth shall also provide coverage for the costs of hospitalization or medical care following childbirth for a period of not less than

48 hours after a vaginal birth; and

96 hours after a caesarean birth.

Except as otherwise required to provide coverage specified under (a) of this section, this section does not affect a payment arrangement entered into between a hospital or health care provider and a health care insurer.

This section may not be construed to require hospitalization or medical care as described under (a)(1) or (2) of this section if the mother giving birth and the mother’s health care provider agree that the mother and any newborn child of the mother should be discharged earlier than required under (a)(1) or (2) of this section.

In this section,

“health care insurer” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

; “health care insurer” includes the Comprehensive Health Insurance Association as described in AS

21.55.010

;

“health care provider” means a person licensed in this state to provide health care services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 1996; am §§ 44 — 46 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1997, paragraph (d)(1) was renumbered as (d)(2), and (d)(2) was renumbered as (d)(1) to maintain alphabetical order.

Sec. 21.42.349.
Coverage for newborn and infant hearing screening.

Except for a fraternal benefit society, a health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews in this state a health care insurance plan shall provide coverage for newborn and infant hearing screening under the schedule described in (b) of this section if the plan covers services provided to women during pregnancy and childbirth and the dependents of a covered individual.

The minimum coverage required under (a) of this section includes

a newborn or infant hearing screening to be performed within 30 days after the child’s birth; and

if the initial screening under (1) of this subsection determines that the child may have a hearing impairment, a confirmatory hearing diagnostic evaluation.

The coverage required by this section may be subject to standard policy provisions that are applicable to other benefits, such as deductible or copayment provisions.

History.

(§ 5 ch 43 SLA 2006)

Sec. 21.42.350.
Exemption of proceeds, annuity contracts. [Repealed, §
14 ch 62 SLA 1982.
For current law see AS 09.38.025(a).]

Sec. 21.42.351.
Coverage for well-baby exams.

A health care insurer that offers health care insurance that covers a dependent of a covered individual shall, initially and at each renewal, offer coverage for the cost of well-baby exams. The coverage required to be offered by this section is subject to standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, including deductible or copayment provisions.

In this section,

“health care insurer” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“health care professional” means a health aide, physician, nurse, and physician assistant, but does not include a practitioner of religious healing;

“well-baby exam” means

a periodic physical examination by a qualified health care professional of a baby during the first 24 months of life in which information is collected on matters including normal development, growth rate, hearing, vision, language skills, motor development, diet, general care, preventative health care, immunizations, and infectious diseases; and

consultation between the health care professional and a parent.

History.

(§ 1 ch 57 SLA 2008)

Sec. 21.42.353.
Coverage for the costs of acupuncture treatment.

Except for a fraternal benefit society, a health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews in this state a health care insurance plan may offer coverage for services of an acupuncturist licensed under AS 08.06 if the plan covers acupuncture treatment by a health care provider who is subject to other provisions of AS 08.

History.

(§ 11 ch 6 SLA 1990; am § 74 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 45 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 47 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.42.355.
Coverage for cost of services provided by certified nurse midwives.

If a health care insurance plan or an excepted benefits policy or contract provides indemnity for the cost of services of a physician provided to women during pregnancy, childbirth, and the period after childbirth, indemnity in a reasonable amount shall also be provided for the cost of an advanced practice registered nurse who provides the same services. Indemnity may be provided under this subsection only if the advanced practice registered nurse is practicing as a certified nurse midwife in accordance with regulations adopted under AS

08.68.100(a)

, and the services provided are within the scope of practice of that certification.

If a health care insurance plan or an excepted benefits policy or contract provides for furnishing those services required of a physician in the care of women during pregnancy, childbirth, and the period after childbirth, the contract shall also provide that an advanced practice registered nurse may furnish those same services instead of a physician. Services may be provided under this subsection only if the advanced practice registered nurse is practicing as a certified nurse midwife in accordance with regulations adopted under AS

08.68.100(a)

, and the services provided are within the scope of practice of that certification.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 1981; am § 75 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 46 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 48 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 36 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

21.42.347

. Renumbered in 1981.
In 1984, the internal references were changed from AS

08.68.410

(5) to AS

08.68.100(a)

to correct a manifest error.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in both (a) and (b), substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner”, substituted “practice registered nurse is practicing” for “nurse practitioner is certified to practice”, inserted “certified” preceding “nurse midwife”, substituted “of” for “authorized by” preceding “that certification”.

Sec. 21.42.360.
Definitions. [Repealed, §
11 ch 163 SLA 1976.
For current law see AS 21.97.]

Sec. 21.42.363.
Eye care under health insurance.

A policy, contract, or prepaid plan for individual or group health insurance issued or delivered in the state that provides reimbursement for a service within the lawful scope of practice of an optometrist licensed under AS 08.72 must provide for reimbursement to a person covered under the policy, contract, or plan who had the service performed by an optometrist.

History.

(§ 37 ch 38 SLA 2002)

Sec. 21.42.365.
Coverage for treatment of alcoholism or drug abuse.

Except for a fraternal benefit society, a health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews in this state a health care insurance plan providing coverage for five or more employees of an employer in the group market shall offer a covered employee or the employee’s dependent coverage for the treatment of alcoholism or drug abuse.

In this section, “alcoholism or drug abuse” means an illness characterized by

a physiological or psychological dependency, or both, on alcoholic beverages or controlled substances as defined in AS

11.71.900

; or

habitual lack of self-control in using alcoholic beverages or controlled substances to the extent that the person’s health is substantially impaired or the person’s social or economic function is substantially disrupted.

History.

(§ 2 ch 150 SLA 1988; am §§ 47 — 49 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 49 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 38 ch 38 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 55 SLA 2009)

Sec. 21.42.370.
[Renumbered as AS 21.42.315.]

Sec. 21.42.375.
Coverage for mammograms.

Except for a fraternal benefit society, a health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews in this state a health care insurance plan shall provide coverage for low-dose mammography screening under the schedule described in (b) of this section if the plan covers mastectomies and prosthetic devices and reconstructive surgery incident to mastectomies.

The minimum coverage required under (a) of this section includes

a baseline mammogram for a covered individual who is at least 35 years of age but less than 40 years of age;

one mammogram every two years for a covered individual who is at least 40 years of age but less than 50 years of age;

an annual mammogram for a covered individual who is at least 50 years of age;

a mammogram at any age for a covered individual with a history of breast cancer or whose parent or sibling has a history of breast cancer, upon referral by a physician.

The coverage required by this section

must be included in the health care insurance plan on a basis that is not less favorable than for other radiological examinations;

may be subject to standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as deductible or copayment provisions.

[Repealed, § 115 ch 81 SLA 1997.]

In this section, “low-dose mammography screening” and “mammogram” mean the X-ray examination of the breast using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, including the X-ray tube, filter, compression device, screens, films, and cassettes, with an average radiation exposure delivery of less than one rad mid-breast, with two views for each breast.

History.

(§ 1 ch 69 SLA 1991; am § 76 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 50 ch 56 SLA 1996; am §§ 50 — 52, 115 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.42.377.
Coverage for colorectal cancer screening.

Except for a fraternal benefit society, a health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews in this state a health care insurance plan shall provide coverage for the costs of colorectal cancer screening examinations and laboratory tests under the schedule described in (b) of this section. The coverage required by this section is subject to standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, including deductible or copayment provisions.

The minimum coverage required under (a) of this section for colorectal cancer screening includes coverage for colorectal cancer examinations and laboratory tests specified in American Cancer Society guidelines for colorectal cancer screening of asymptomatic individuals. Coverage shall be provided for all colorectal screening examinations and tests that are administered at a frequency identified in the American Cancer Society guidelines for colorectal cancer.

Coverage provided under this section applies to a covered individual who is

at least 50 years of age; or

less than 50 years of age and at high risk for colorectal cancer.

All screening options identified in (b) of this section shall be covered by the insurer, with the choice of option determined by the covered individual in consultation with a health care provider.

For individuals considered at average risk for colorectal cancer, coverage or benefits shall be provided for the choice of screening, so long as it is conducted in accordance with the specified frequency. For individuals considered at high risk for colorectal cancer, screening shall be provided at a frequency determined necessary by a health care provider.

An employer that provides a health care insurance plan under this section shall notify each covered individual of the coverage for colorectal cancer screenings unless coverage for colorectal cancer screening previously exists. The notice shall be included in the health benefit handbook or be provided by written or electronic communication between an employer or health plan administrator and a covered individual. However, if the covered individual purchases the health care insurance plan from the insurer issuing the policy, the insurer is responsible for notifying the covered individual of the coverage for colorectal cancer screening under this section.

In this section, “individual considered at high risk for colorectal cancer” means an individual who faces a high risk for colorectal cancer because of

family history;

prior experience of cancer or precursor neoplastic polyps;

a history of a chronic digestive disease condition, including inflammatory bowel disease, Crohn’s Disease, or ulcerative colitis;

the presence of any appropriate recognized gene markers for colorectal cancer; or

other predisposing factors.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 2006)

Sec. 21.42.380.
Coverage for treatment of phenylketonuria.

Except for a fraternal benefit society, a health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews in this state a health care insurance plan shall provide coverage under the plan for the formulas necessary for the treatment of phenylketonuria. This subsection does not apply to a health care insurance plan that the director has determined by order should be excluded from this subsection.

A health care insurer providing coverage under this section may impose reasonable contract limitations but may not refuse coverage based on a preexisting condition of phenylketonuria or require that an individual covered under the plan pay a higher deductible or copayment for the cost of treating phenylketonuria than for the cost of treating another condition or illness.

In this section, “cost” means the lowest of the following:

the actual charge for the treatment received for phenylketonuria;

the usual, customary, and reasonable charge for the treatment as determined by the contract of coverage; or

the charge agreed to by contract between the treatment provider and the health care insurer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1992; am § 77 ch 62 SLA 1995; am §§ 51, 52 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 53 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

21.42.375

. Renumbered in 1992.

Sec. 21.42.385.
Dental, vision, and hearing coverage.

Except for a fraternal benefit society, a health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews in this state a health care insurance plan, including a Medicare supplement policy to the extent not prohibited by 42 U.S.C. 1395 (Social Security Act), shall offer to each plan sponsor or individual minimum dental, vision, and hearing coverage described in (b) of this section. Coverage required under this subsection may be offered as a rider or in a separate policy.

The minimum coverage required under (a) of this section

may be provided under contract with another health care insurer;

may not be less than the dental, vision, and hearing coverage provided on July 1, 2009, to an individual entitled to medical benefits under AS

39.35.535

(public employees’ retirement system of Alaska); and

shall be adjusted by the director on July 1, 2012, and every three years thereafter to correspond to changes in coverage provided to individuals entitled to medical benefits under AS

39.35.535

.

This section does not apply to a health care insurer that has written less than $300,000 in premiums in the previous calendar year. A health care insurer exempt under this subsection shall disclose the exemption when offering, issuing for delivery, delivering, or renewing a health care insurance plan or an excepted benefits contract, and shall advise the individual covered under the plan that health care insurers that have written more than $300,000 in premiums in the previous calendar year are required to offer coverage under (a) and (b) of this section.

This section does not require an insurer who offers only group insurance coverage under AS 21.54 to offer dental, vision, and hearing coverage to an individual.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1992; am §§ 53, 54 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 54 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 19 ch 30 SLA 2009)

Sec. 21.42.390.
Coverage for treatment of diabetes.

A health care insurer that offers in this state a health care insurance plan that includes coverage for pharmacy services shall initially and at each renewal provide coverage for the cost of treating diabetes, including medication, equipment, and supplies. All health care insurance plans must include coverage for outpatient self-management training or education, and medical nutrition therapy, if diabetes treatment is prescribed by a health care provider. The coverage required by this section is subject to standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, including deductible or copayment provisions. Coverage for the cost of diabetes outpatient self-management training or education and for the cost of medical nutrition therapy is only required if provided by a health care provider with training in the treatment of diabetes.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 23 SLA 2000.]

In this section,

“diabetes” includes insulin-dependent diabetes, insulin-using diabetes, gestational diabetes, and non-insulin-using diabetes;

“health care provider” means a person licensed to provide health care services as required by the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 23 SLA 2000; am § 39 ch 38 SLA 2002)

Sec. 21.42.392.
Requirements relating to dental care coverage provisions.

A health care insurer who provides coverage for dental care may not include in the health care insurance plan or contract a provision that

prohibits a covered person from obtaining dental care services from a dentist of the person’s choice, including a specialist;

restricts a covered person’s right to receive full information from the person’s dentist regarding the care or treatment options that the dentist believes are in the best interests of the person.

A health care insurance plan or contract that provides coverage for dental services that allows the health care insurer to review a treatment plan or conduct a utilization review must contain a provision that a treatment plan review or utilization review relating to dental care for a covered person receiving treatment in this state must be conducted by a dentist if the claim for reimbursement or payment is denied.

A health care insurer that provides coverage for dental care

may reimburse a covered person at a different rate because of the person’s choice of a dentist if the dentist is not a part of the covered person’s dental network or preferred provider organization agreement; the covered expense for non-network providers may not be less than that allowed to a network provider, although the covered expense may be reimbursed at a lower percentage or with higher deductibles than if the service had been provided within the network;

may not limit a fee set by a dentist for a service unless the service is covered under the insurer’s plan or contract; and

may offer a dentist the option of entering into a preferred provider contract with the insurer that provides a fee schedule for covered services only or a fee schedule for both covered and uncovered services; under this paragraph,

the health care insurer may not

take an action against the dentist based on the dentist’s refusal to enter into a contract with an insurer;

fail to list a dentist who does not enter into a contract with an insurer in the insurer’s marketing materials; or

take action against the dentist during the management or administration of a contract based on the dentist’s choice of contract;

the terms or provisions of the contract

may not violate AS

45.50.562

—

45.50.566

; and

may authorize the insurer to provide information to the insured describing the dentist’s choice of contract and fee schedules;

“covered service” means a health care service for which a health care insurer pays a benefit for all or part of the service, including a benefit that is available but limited by deductible, coinsurance, or frequency terms under the contract between the insurer and the insured.

A health care insurer may not deny

dental coverage, cancel a health care insurance plan or contract, or otherwise take action against a covered person or a dentist because the person has asserted a right described in this section;

dental coverage or eligibility for dental coverage because the covered person chooses a dentist outside of a preferred provider organization agreement.

A covered person may bring a civil action against a health care insurer to enforce the person’s rights under this section if the covered person has exhausted the administrative appeal process.

A dentist who treats a covered person may not waive uncovered dental expenses for which the covered person has liability because a covered person chose the dentist outside of a dental network or a preferred provider organization agreement.

In this section,

“covered expense” means charges that are payable under plan provisions;

“dentist” means a person licensed to practice dentistry;

“preferred provider” means a dental provider who has signed an agreement with a dental care plan to provide services to plan participants at a specific rate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 69 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 55 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

21.42.390

.
Renumbered in 2000.

Sec. 21.42.395.
Coverage for prostate and cervical cancer detection.

Except for a fraternal benefit society, a health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews in this state a health care insurance plan shall provide coverage for the costs of prostate cancer screening tests as required under the schedule described in (b) of this section and shall provide coverage for the costs of cervical cancer screening tests as required under (c) of this section. The coverage required by this section is subject to standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, including deductible or copayment provisions. If a physician recommends that a covered individual undergo prostate cancer screening by taking a prostate antigen blood test, coverage may not be denied because the covered individual has already had a digital rectal examination and the examination results were negative.

The minimum coverage required under (a) of this section includes an annual prostate cancer screening test for a person who is

at least 35 years of age but less than 40 years of age and the person is in a high risk group; in this paragraph, “high risk” means a person who is an African-American or who has a family history of prostate cancer; or

40 or more years of age.

The minimum coverage required under (a) of this section for cervical cancer screening is an annual pap smear cancer screening test for a person who is 18 or more years of age.

[Repealed, § 115 ch 81 SLA 1997.]

In this section, “prostate cancer screening tests” includes a prostate antigen blood test or another test that is equivalent or better in cancer detection.

History.

(§ 1 ch 74 SLA 1996; am §§ 55, 115 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 90 SLA 2000)

Sec. 21.42.397.
Coverage for autism spectrum disorders.

Except for a fraternal benefit society, a health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews a health care insurance plan in this state shall provide coverage for the costs of the diagnosis and treatment of autism spectrum disorders. Coverage required by this subsection must include treatment prescribed by a licensed physician, psychologist, or advanced practice registered nurse, provided by or supervised by an autism service provider, and as identified in a treatment plan developed following a comprehensive evaluation. Covered treatment includes medically necessary pharmacy care, psychiatric care, psychological care, habilitative or rehabilitative care, and therapeutic care. In this subsection,

“habilitative or rehabilitative care” means professional counseling, guidance services, and treatment programs necessary to develop, restore, or maintain the functioning of an individual to the maximum extent practicable, including applied behavior analysis or other structured behavioral therapies; in this paragraph, “applied behavior analysis” means the design, implementation, and evaluation of environmental modifications, using behavioral stimuli and consequences, including direct observation, measurement, and functional analysis of the relationship between environment and behavior, to produce socially significant improvement in human behavior or to prevent the loss of an attained skill or function;

“therapeutic care” means services provided by or under the supervision of a speech-language pathologist licensed under AS 08.11 or an occupational therapist or physical therapist licensed under AS 08.84.

Coverage under this section

is required to be provided only to individuals under 21 years of age;

may not limit the number of visits to an autism service provider for treatment;

is subject to copayment, deductible, and coinsurance provisions, and other general exclusions or limitations included in a health insurance policy to the same extent as other health care services covered by the policy; and

must cover medically necessary treatment that is coordinated with an education program, but may not be contingent on the coordination of treatment with an education program.

An insurer providing health care insurance to a small employer in the group market with 20 or fewer employees is not required to provide insurance coverage to the small employer that includes the coverage required under (a) of this section.

The director may waive the coverage required in this section for an insurer providing health care insurance to a small employer in the group market with 21 — 25 employees if the small employer demonstrates to the director by actual claims experience over any consecutive 12-month period that compliance with this section has increased the premium cost of the small employer’s health insurance policy by three percent or more during the consecutive 12-month period.

This section does not limit benefits that are otherwise available to an individual under a health care insurance plan.

A health care insurer may not refuse to deliver, execute, issue, amend, or renew coverage to an individual or terminate coverage because the individual is diagnosed with or has received treatment for autism spectrum disorders.

In this section,

“autism service provider” means an individual who is licensed, certified, or registered by the applicable state licensing board or by a nationally recognized certifying organization and who provides direct services to an individual with an autism spectrum disorder;

“autism spectrum disorders” means pervasive developmental disorders, or a group of conditions having substantially the same characteristics as pervasive developmental disorders, as defined in the American Psychiatric Association’s Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders-IV-TR, as amended or reissued from time to time;

“health care insurance plan” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“health care insurer” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“medically necessary” means any care, treatment, intervention, service, or item prescribed by a licensed physician, psychologist, or advanced practice registered nurse in accordance with accepted standards of practice that will, or is reasonably expected to,

prevent the onset of an illness, condition, injury, or disability;

reduce or ameliorate the physical, mental, or developmental effects of an illness, condition, injury, or disability;

assist to achieve or maintain maximum functional capacity in performing daily activities, taking into account both the functional capacity of the individual and the functional capacity of other persons of the individual’s age.

History.

(§ 1 ch 63 SLA 2012; am §§ 37, 38 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For provision establishing an autism task force tasked with analyzing fiscal, policy, and health care issues relating to autism, and filing a report by January 15, 2015, see sec. 2, ch. 63, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts, as amended by ch. 35, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (a) and (g)(5), substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner”.

Effective dates. —

Section 5, ch. 63, SLA 2012 makes this section effective January 1, 2013.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 3, ch. 63, SLA 2012, this section “applies to a health insurance policy that is offered, issued for delivery, delivered, or renewed on or after January 1, 2013.”

Sec. 21.42.400.
Coverage for reconstructive surgery following mastectomy.

A health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews in this state a health care insurance plan providing medical and surgical benefits for mastectomies shall comply with 42 U.S.C. 300gg-6 and 42 U.S.C. 300gg-52 regarding coverage for reconstructive surgery following mastectomies.

History.

(§ 10 ch 72 SLA 2000)

Sec. 21.42.405.
High deductible health plan.

A health care insurer that offers, issues, delivers, or renews a health care insurance plan in this state may apply deductible or copayment requirements to health care benefits and services that qualify the health care insurance plan as a high deductible health plan.

In this section, “high deductible health plan” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 223 (Internal Revenue Code).

History.

(§ 8 ch 38 SLA 2007)

Sec. 21.42.410.
Coverage of dependent students on medically necessary leaves of absence.

A health care insurer that offers a health care insurance plan in the individual or group market shall comply with the coverage requirements for dependent students on medically necessary leaves of absence under 42 U.S.C. 300gg-54.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2009)

Sec. 21.42.415.
Coverage for clinical trials related to cancer.

A health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews a health care insurance plan in the state shall cover routine patient care costs incurred by a patient enrolled in an approved clinical trial related to cancer, including leukemia, lymphoma, and bone marrow stem cell disorders.

The health care insurer is required to provide coverage under this section only if the patient’s treating physician determines that

there is no clearly superior noninvestigational treatment alternative; and

available clinical or preclinical data provide a reasonable expectation that the treatment provided in the clinical trial will be at least as efficacious as any noninvestigational alternative.

The coverage to be provided under (a) of this section must include payment for the costs of

prevention, diagnosis, treatment, and palliative care of cancer;

medical care for an approved clinical trial related to cancer that would otherwise be covered under a health care insurance plan if the medical care were not in connection with an approved clinical trial related to cancer;

items or services necessary to provide an investigational item or service;

the diagnosis or treatment of complications;

a drug or device approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration without regard to whether the United States Food and Drug Administration approved the drug or device for use in treating a patient’s particular condition, but only to the extent that the drug or device is not paid for by the manufacturer, distributor, or provider of the drug or device;

services necessary to administer a drug or device under evaluation in the clinical trial; and

transportation for the patient that is primarily for and essential to the medical care.

The coverage to be provided under (a) of this section may not include the cost of

a drug or device that is associated with the clinical trial that has not been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration;

housing, companion expenses, or other nonclinical expenses associated with the clinical trial;

an item or service provided solely to satisfy data collection and analysis and not used in the clinical management of the patient;

an item or service excluded from coverage under the patient’s health care insurance plan; and

an item or service paid for or customarily paid for through grants or other funding.

The coverage required by this section is subject to the standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, including deductible, coinsurance, or copayment provisions.

This section does not apply to a fraternal benefit society.

In this section, “approved clinical trial” means a scientific study using human subjects designed to test and improve prevention, diagnosis, treatment, or palliative care of cancer, or the safety and effectiveness of a drug, device, or procedure used in the prevention, diagnosis, treatment, or palliative care of a subject, if the study is approved by

an institutional review board that complies with 45 C.F.R. Part 46; and

one or more of the following:

the United States Department of Health and Human Services, National Institutes of Health, or its institutes or centers;

the United States Department of Health and Human Services, United States Food and Drug Administration;

the United States Department of Defense;

the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or

a nongovernmental research entity abiding by current National Institutes of Health guidelines.

History.

(§ 1 ch 117 SLA 2010)

Sec. 21.42.420.
Coverage for prescription drugs; specialty drug tiers prohibited.

A health care insurer that offers, issues, delivers, or renews a health care insurance plan in the individual or group market in the state that provides coverage for prescription drugs for which cost sharing, deductibles, or copayment obligations are determined by unique categories or specialty tiers may impose cost sharing, deductibles, or copayment obligations for a unique category or specialty tier prescription drug that exceed the dollar amount of cost sharing, deductibles, or copayment obligations, as applicable, for a nonpreferred brand drug or the drug’s equivalent, but only if the insurer notifies the insured of the cost sharing, deductible, or copayment terms applicable to unique categories or specialty tiers at least 90 days before the terms apply.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent relating to this section, see §§ 1 and 2, ch. 52, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 7, ch. 52, SLA 2012 makes this section effective January 1, 2013.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 6, ch. 52, SLA 2012, this section applies to a health insurance plan offered, issued for delivery, delivered, or renewed on or after January 1, 2013.

Sec. 21.42.422.
Coverage for telehealth.

A health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, or renews in the state a health care insurance plan in the group or individual market shall provide coverage for benefits provided through telehealth by a health care provider licensed in this state and may not require that prior in-person contact occur between a health care provider and a patient before payment is made for covered services.

In this section,

“health care insurer” means a person transacting the business of health care insurance, including an insurance company licensed under AS 21.09, a hospital or medical service corporation licensed under AS 21.87, a fraternal benefit society licensed under AS 21.84, a health maintenance organization licensed under AS 21.86, the Comprehensive Health Insurance Association described in AS

21.55.010

, a multiple employer welfare arrangement, a church plan, and a governmental plan, except for a nonfederal governmental plan that elects to be excluded under 42 U.S.C. 300gg-21(a)(2) (Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996);

“telehealth” has the meaning given in AS

47.05.270(e)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 17 SLA 2016; am §§ 1, 2 ch 3 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective March 17, 2020, in (a), substituted “individual market shall provide coverage for benefits” for “individual market that provides mental health benefits shall provide coverage for mental health benefits”; and added (b).

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 17, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect September 11, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 2, ch. 17, SLA 2016, this section "applies to a health care insurance plan offered, issued for delivery, delivered, or renewed on or after September 11, 2016."

Sec. 21.42.425.
Coverage for prescription topical eye medication.

A health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews a health care insurance plan in the group or individual market in the state that provides coverage for prescription topical eye medication shall allow the early refill of a prescription for a topical eye medication to treat a chronic condition before the last day of the prescribed dosage period, without regard to a coverage restriction.

A covered person may request an early refill under this section

not earlier than 23 days after a prescription for a 30-day supply is dispensed;

not earlier than 45 days after a prescription for a 60-day supply is dispensed;

not earlier than 68 days after a prescription for a 90-day supply is dispensed;

if the prescriber has indicated the number of refills needed; and

if the prescription topical eye medication being refilled is covered under the covered person’s policy.

A covered person may receive an early refill under this section not more than once during the approved dosage period.

A covered person may only receive an early refill under this section if the refill does not exceed the number of refills prescribed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 38 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 38, SLA 2013, which enacted this section, took effect on September 1, 2013.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 2, ch. 38, SLA 2013, this section applies to a health care insurance plan offered, issued for delivery, delivered, or renewed on or after January 1, 2014.